District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2885.04

Board of Pharmacy.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1102(c), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-2004, 2-2005.

Editor's Notes

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.